src/morphology/hacks/51.lexc
[WORD_ID=viidesseptiljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=ESSIVEIVEIVE]:0viidensinäseptiljardinneina   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=viidesseptiljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=GENITIVEITIVEITIVE]:0viidensienseptiljardien   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=viidesseptiljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=ILLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:0viidensiinseptiljardinneiin   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=viidesseptiljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=INESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVE]:0viidensissäseptiljardinneissa   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=viidesseptiljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=INSTRUCTIVETRUCTIVE]:0viidensinseptiljardinnein   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=viidesseptiljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=NOMINATIVEINATIVEINATIVE]:0viidensitseptiljardit   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=viidesseptiljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=PARTITIVETITIVETITIVE]:0viidensiäseptiljardinneja   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=viidesseptiljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=TRANSLATIVENSLATIVENSLATIVE]:0viidensiksiseptiljardinneiksi   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=viidesseptiljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=ABESSIVESSIVE]:0viidennettäseptiljarditta   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=viidesseptiljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=ABLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:0viidenneltäseptiljardilta   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=viidesseptiljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=ADESSIVESSIVESSIVE]:0viidennelläseptiljardilla   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=viidesseptiljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=ALLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:0viidennelleseptiljardille   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=viidesseptiljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=ELATIVETIVETIVE]:0viidennestäseptiljardista   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=viidesseptiljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=ESSIVEIVEIVE]:0viidentenäseptiljardina   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=viidesseptiljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=GENITIVEITIVEITIVE]:0viidenseptiljardin   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=viidesseptiljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=ILLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:0viidenteenseptiljardin   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=viidesseptiljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=INESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVE]:0viidessäseptiljardissa   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=viidesseptiljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=NOMINATIVEINATIVEINATIVE]:0viidensiseptiljardia   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=viidesseptiljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=PARTITIVETITIVETITIVE]:0viidettäseptiljardia   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=viidesseptiljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=TRANSLATIVENSLATIVENSLATIVE]:0viideksiseptiljardiksi   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=viidesseptiljoonas][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=ABESSIVESSIVE]:0viidensittäseptiljoonansitta   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=viidesseptiljoonas][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=ABLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:0viidensiltäseptiljoonansilta   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=viidesseptiljoonas][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=ADESSIVESSIVESSIVE]:0viidensilläseptiljoonansilla   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=viidesseptiljoonas][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=ALLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:0viidensilleseptiljoonansille   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=viidesseptiljoonas][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=COMITATIVEITATIVEITATIVE]:0viidensineseptiljoonansine   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=viidesseptiljoonas][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=ELATIVETIVETIVE]:0viidensistäseptiljoonansista   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=viidesseptiljoonas][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=ESSIVEIVEIVE]:0viidensinäseptiljoonansina   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=viidesseptiljoonas][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=GENITIVEITIVEITIVE]:0viidensienseptiljoonansien   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=viidesseptiljoonas][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=ILLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:0viidensiinseptiljoonansiin   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=viidesseptiljoonas][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=INESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVE]:0viidensissäseptiljoonansissa   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=viidesseptiljoonas][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=INSTRUCTIVETRUCTIVE]:0viidensinseptiljoonansin   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=viidesseptiljoonas][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=NOMINATIVEINATIVEINATIVE]:0viidensitseptiljoonat   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=viidesseptiljoonas][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=PARTITIVETITIVETITIVE]:0viidensiäseptiljoonansia   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=viidesseptiljoonas][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=TRANSLATIVENSLATIVENSLATIVE]:0viidensiksiseptiljoonansiksi   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=viidesseptiljoonas][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=ABESSIVESSIVE]:0viidennettäseptiljoonatta   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=viidesseptiljoonas][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=ABLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:0viidenneltäseptiljoonalta   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=viidesseptiljoonas][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=ADESSIVESSIVESSIVE]:0viidennelläseptiljoonalla   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=viidesseptiljoonas][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=ALLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:0viidennelleseptiljoonalle   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=viidesseptiljoonas][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=ELATIVETIVETIVE]:0viidennestäseptiljoonasta   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=viidesseptiljoonas][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=ESSIVEIVEIVE]:0viidentenäseptiljoonana   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=viidesseptiljoonas][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=GENITIVEITIVEITIVE]:0viidenseptiljoonan   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=viidesseptiljoonas][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=ILLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:0viidenteenseptiljoonaan   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=viidesseptiljoonas][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=INESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVE]:0viidessäseptiljoonassa   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=viidesseptiljoonas][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=NOMINATIVEINATIVEINATIVE]:0viidensiseptiljoonaa   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=viidesseptiljoonas][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=PARTITIVETITIVETITIVE]:0viidettäseptiljoonaa   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=viidesseptiljoonas][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=TRANSLATIVENSLATIVENSLATIVE]:0viideksiseptiljoonaksi   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=viidestoista][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=ABESSIVESSIVE]:0viidensittätoista NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=viidestoista][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=ABLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:0viidensiltätoista NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=viidestoista][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=ADESSIVESSIVESSIVE]:0viidensillätoista NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=viidestoista][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=ALLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:0viidensilletoista NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=viidestoista][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=COMITATIVEITATIVEITATIVE]:0viidensinetoista NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=viidestoista][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=ELATIVETIVETIVE]:0viidensistätoista NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=viidestoista][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=ESSIVEIVEIVE]:0viidensinätoista NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=viidestoista][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=GENITIVEITIVEITIVE]:0viidensientoista NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=viidestoista][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=ILLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:0viidensiintoista NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=viidestoista][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=INESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVE]:0viidensissätoista NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=viidestoista][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=NOMINATIVEINATIVEINATIVE]:0viidensitoista NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=viidestoista][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=PARTITIVETITIVETITIVE]:0viidensiätoista NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=viidestoista][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=TRANSLATIVENSLATIVENSLATIVE]:0viidensiksitoista NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=viidestoista][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=ABESSIVESSIVE]:0viidennettätoista NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=viidestoista][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=ABLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:0viidenneltätoista NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=viidestoista][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=ADESSIVESSIVESSIVE]:0viidennellätoista NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=viidestoista][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=ALLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:0viidentelletoista NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=viidestoista][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=ELATIVETIVETIVE]:0viidestätoista NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=viidestoista][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=ESSIVEIVEIVE]:0viidentenätoista NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=viidestoista][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=GENITIVEITIVEITIVE]:0viidentoista NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=viidestoista][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=ILLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:0viidenteentoista NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=viidestoista][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=INESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVE]:0viidennessätoista NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=viidestoista][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=NOMINATIVEINATIVEINATIVE]:0viidensitoista NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=viidestoista][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=PARTITIVETITIVETITIVE]:0viidettätoista NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=viidestoista][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=TRANSLATIVENSLATIVENSLATIVE]:0viideksitoista NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=viidestredekiljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=ABESSIVESSIVE]:0viidensittätredekiljardinneitta   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=viidestredekiljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=ABLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:0viidensiltätredekiljardinneilta   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=viidestredekiljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=ADESSIVESSIVESSIVE]:0viidensillätredekiljardinneilla   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=viidestredekiljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=ALLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:0viidensilletredekiljardinneille   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=viidestredekiljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=COMITATIVEITATIVEITATIVE]:0viidensinetredekiljardinneine   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=viidestredekiljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=ELATIVETIVETIVE]:0viidensistätredekiljardinneista   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=viidestredekiljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=ESSIVEIVEIVE]:0viidensinätredekiljardinneina   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=viidestredekiljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=GENITIVEITIVEITIVE]:0viidensientredekiljardien   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=viidestredekiljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=ILLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:0viidensiintredekiljardinneiin   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=viidestredekiljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=INESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVE]:0viidensissätredekiljardinneissa   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=viidestredekiljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=INSTRUCTIVETRUCTIVE]:0viidensintredekiljardinnein   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=viidestredekiljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=NOMINATIVEINATIVEINATIVE]:0viidensittredekiljardit   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=viidestredekiljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=PARTITIVETITIVETITIVE]:0viidensiätredekiljardinneja   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=viidestredekiljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=TRANSLATIVENSLATIVENSLATIVE]:0viidensiksitredekiljardinneiksi   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=viidestredekiljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=ABESSIVESSIVE]:0viidennettätredekiljarditta   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=viidestredekiljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=ABLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:0viidenneltätredekiljardilta   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=viidestredekiljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=ADESSIVESSIVESSIVE]:0viidennellätredekiljardilla   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
